test/src/morphology/V-taeutw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - täutõ: # Verb 21 'eng /est täita/fin' - full paradigm
     täutõ+V+Inf: täutõ
     täutõ+V+Ger: täutõs
     täutõ+V+Sup: tǟtam
     täutõ+V+Sup+Ine: tǟtamõs
     täutõ+V+Sup+Ela: tǟtamõst
     täutõ+V+Sup+Tra: tǟtamõks
     täutõ+V+Sup+Abe: tǟtamõt
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tǟtab
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tǟtat
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tǟtabõd
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tǟtiz
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tǟtizt, tǟtiztõ]
     täutõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tǟtizt, tǟtiztõ]
     täutõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: täut
     täutõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tǟtaks
     täutõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tǟta
     täutõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: täutõ
     täutõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tǟtagid
     täutõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tǟtag
     täutõ+V+QuoSg3: tǟtaji
     täutõ+V+ActPrfPrc: täutõn
     täutõ+V+PssPrfPrc: täutõd
